Utah statutes.
58-74-102.   Definitions.
In addition to the definitions in Section 58-1-102, as used in this chapter:
(1)  "Board" means the Certified Court Reporters Licensing Board created in
Section 58-74-201.
(2)  "Certified Shorthand Reporter" means any person licensed under this
chapter who is engaged in the practice of shorthand reporting.
(3)  "Certified court reporter" means any person who engages in the practice
of court reporting who is:
(a)  a shorthand reporter certified by the National Court Reporters
Association; or
(b)  a voice reporter certified by the National Verbatim Reporters
Association.
(4)  "Certified Voice Reporter" means any person licensed under this chapter
who engages in the practice of voice reporting.
(5)  "Official court reporter" means a certified shorthand reporter employed
by the courts.
(6)  "Official court transcriber" means a person certified in accordance with
rules of the Judicial Council as competent to transcribe into written form an
audio or video recording of court proceedings.
(7)  "Practice of court reporting" means the making of a verbatim record of
any trial, legislative public hearing, state agency public hearing,
deposition, examination before trial, hearing or proceeding before any grand
jury, referee, board, commission, master or arbitrator, or other sworn
testimony given under oath.
(8)  "Practice of shorthand reporting" means the practice of making a verbatim
record, using symbols or abbreviations.
(9)  "Practice of voice reporting" means the practice of making a verbatim
record, using voice writing.
(10)  "Voice writing" means the making of a verbatim record of the spoken word
by means of repeating the words of the speaker into a device capable of either
digital translation into English text or creation of a tape or digital
recording.
(11)  "Unlawful conduct" is as defined in Sections 58-1-501 and 58-74-501.
(12)  "Unprofessional conduct" is as defined in Sections 58-1-501 and
58-74-502 and as may be further defined by rule.
